Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2112
Consultation, defined.

Consultation means a professional collaborative relationship which is between a licensed mental health practitioner and a consultant who is a psychologist licensed to engage in the practice of psychology in this state as provided in section 38-3111 or as provided in similar provisions of the Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact, a qualified physician, a licensed independent mental health practitioner, or a professional counselor holding a privilege to practice in Nebraska under the Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact and in which (1) the consultant makes a diagnosis based on information supplied by the licensed mental health practitioner and any additional assessment deemed necessary by the consultant and (2) the consultant and the licensed mental health practitioner jointly develop a treatment plan which indicates the responsibility of each professional for implementing elements of the plan, updating the plan, and assessing the client's progress.

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 24;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 95;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,305;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 731;

Laws 2008, LB1108, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 33;

Laws 2022, LB752, § 11.

Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact, see section 38-4201.

Psychology Interjurisdictional Compact, see section 38-3901.